District of Columbia statutes.
32-1404

Meetings of Apprenticeship Council; rules and regulations; reports.

The Apprenticeship Council shall meet at the call of the Associate Director of Apprenticeship, or the chairman thereof, and shall aid in formulating policies for the effective administration of this subchapter. Subject to the approval of the Director of the Department of Employment Services, the Apprenticeship Council shall establish standards for apprenticeship agreements in accordance with those prescribed by this subchapter, shall issue such rules and regulations as may be necessary to carry out the intent and purposes of this subchapter, and shall perform such other functions as are necessary to carry out the intent of this subchapter. Once every year the Registration Agency shall make a report through the Mayor of its findings and activities to the Council of the District of Columbia and to the public.

History

May 21, 1946, 60 Stat. 205, ch. 267, § 4
Oct. 22, 2015, D.C. Law 21-36, § 2012(d), 62 DCR 10905

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 36-404.
1973 Ed., § 36-124.

Effect of Amendments

The 2015 amendment by D.C. Law 21-36 substituted “Associate Director of Apprenticeship” for “Director” in the first sentence; substituted “Director of the Department of Employment Services” for “Secretary of Labor” in the second sentence, and rewrote the last sentence.

Temporary Legislation

For temporary (225 days) amendment of this section, see § 2(d) of the Apprenticeship Modernization Temporary Amendment Act of 2015 (D.C. Law 20-256, Apr. 30, 2015, 62 DCR 2259).

Emergency Legislation

For temporary (90 days) amendment of this section, see § 2(d) of the Apprenticeship Modernization Emergency Amendment Act of 2014 (D.C. Act 20-579, Jan. 13, 2015, 62 DCR 1258, 21 STAT 724).
For temporary (90 days) amendment of this section, see § 2(d) of the Apprenticeship Modernization Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 2015 (D.C. Act 21-16, Mar. 26, 2015, 62 DCR 3847, 21 DCSTAT 843).
For temporary (90 days) amendment of this section, see § 2012(c) of the Fiscal Year 2016 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2015 (D.C. Act 21-127, July 27, 2015, 62 DCR 10201).

Change in Government

This section originated at a time when local government powers were delegated to a Board of Commissioners of the District of Columbia (see Acts Relating to the Establishment of the District of Columbia and its Various Forms of Governmental Organization in Volume 1). Section 401 of Reorganization Plan No. 3 of 1967 (see Reorganization Plans in Volume 1) transferred all of the functions of the Board of Commissioners under this section to a single Commissioner. The District of Columbia Self-Government and Governmental Reorganization Act, 87 Stat. 818, § 711 ( D.C. Code, § 1-207.11), abolished the District of Columbia Council and the Office of Commissioner of the District of Columbia. These branches of government were replaced by the Council of the District of Columbia and the Office of Mayor of the District of Columbia, respectively. Accordingly, and also pursuant to § 714(a) of such Act ( D.C. Code, § 1-207.14(a)), appropriate changes in terminology were made in this section.